Washington statutes.
RCW 38.38.320

[Art. 33] Forwarding of charges.

When a person is held for trial by general court-martial the commanding officer shall, within eight days after the accused is ordered into arrest or confinement, if practicable, forward the charges, together with the investigation and allied papers, to the governor. If that is not practicable, the officer shall report in writing to the governor the reasons for delay.

[ 1989 c 48 s 32; 1963 c 220 s 35.]